Arkansas, session 2025, HB1998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 1, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 2 — James McFerron Mental Health, Wellness, and Resiliency Act

12-1-201. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "James McFerron
Mental Health, Wellness, and Resiliency Act".

12-1-202. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Mental health conditions affect a significant portion of
first responders across the state and have long-term impacts on first
*CEB282*
04/07/2025 2:48:56 PM CEB282

HB1998
responders, their families, and the communities they serve;
(2) Increased training for peer-to-peer support and access to
mental health, leadership, wellness, and resiliency programs and services
lead to better mental and physical wellness in our first responders across
the state;
(3) Mental health, leadership, wellness, and resiliency training
and education programs improve a first responder's ability to cope with
stress, both on and off duty, trauma, and adversity; and
(4) A coordinated effort is needed to address first responder
mental health, leadership, wellness, and resiliency disparities amongst
state, county, and local agencies and to promote mental health, leadership,
wellness, and resiliency.
(b) The General Assembly intends this act to provide for mental
health, leadership, wellness, and resiliency training programs, services, and
resources to be accessible to all first responders across the state,
promoting holistic wellness.

12-1-203. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Certified peer support member” means a first responder, a
retired first responder, or a chaplain who has received training in providing
peer-to-peer support and been certified by the Department of Public Safety to
provide peer-to-peer support to other first responders;
(2) “Chaplain” means a member of the clergy;
(3) “First responder” means a person with specialized training
who is among the first to arrive and provide assistance or incident
resolution at the scene of an emergency, including without limitation a
certified law enforcement officer, a firefighter, an emergency medical
services provider, a public safety or emergency medical dispatcher, and an
employee of a correctional facility; and
(4) "Peer-to-peer support" includes without limitation
trainings, programs, resources, and emotional and moral support in subjects
including without limitation mental health, leadership, wellness, resiliency,
and critical incident stress management.

12-1-204. Expansion of mental health services.
04/07/2025 2:48:56 PM CEB282

HB1998
The Department of Public Safety shall develop and provide to first
responders in every region of the state:
(1) Training to become a certified peer support member; and
(2) Programs and resources on subjects including without
limitation mental health, leadership, wellness, resiliency, and critical
incident stress management.

12-1-205. Peer-to-peer support network.
(a) The Department of Public Safety shall:
(1) Establish a peer-to-peer support network consisting of
volunteers who are certified peer support members;
(2) Designate an employee of the department to serve as the
coordinator for the peer-to-peer support network; and
(3) Work to ensure that members of the peer-to-peer support
network are located throughout the state.
(b) The department shall coordinate with the members of the peer-to-
peer network to:
(1) Provide peer-to-peer support to a requesting agency that
employs a first responder; and
(2) Ensure that peer-to-peer support is accessible to a first
responder in the state, regardless of location.

12-1-206. Reporting.
The Department of Public Safety shall provide an annual report to the
Governor and Legislative Council summarizing the department's activities
under this subchapter.










04/07/2025 2:48:56 PM CEB282